Texas statutes.
CIVIL PRACTICE AND REMEDIES CODE

TITLE 7. ALTERNATE METHODS OF DISPUTE RESOLUTION

CHAPTER 155. SETTLEMENT WEEKS

Sec. 155.001. SETTLEMENT WEEKS REQUIRED. In every county with a population of 150,000 or greater there shall be a settlement week during law week and judicial conference week each year or during any other two weeks as the administrative judge of each judicial district may designate. During these weeks the district courts, constitutional and statutory county courts, and the family law courts will facilitate the voluntary settlement of civil and family law cases.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1211, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 5.005, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 155.002. SETTLEMENT WEEK COMMITTEE. The administrative judge of each judicial district shall appoint a committee of attorneys and lay persons to effectuate each settlement week. The committee may include the director of any established mediation or alternative dispute resolution center in the county and the chairperson of the local bar association's committee on alternative dispute resolution.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1211, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 5.006, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 155.003. ATTORNEY TO SERVE AS MEDIATOR. Any attorney currently licensed in the state may serve as mediator during the settlement weeks under such terms and conditions and with such training as may be determined by the administrative judge of the judicial district. Any such attorney so appointed by the court must meet the qualifications and will be governed by the rules of conduct set forth in Sections 154.052 and 154.053. Any attorney so requested by the administrative judge of the judicial district shall serve as a mediator during the settlement weeks.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1211, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 5.007, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 155.004. APPLICATION OF CERTAIN ALTERNATE DISPUTE RESOLUTION PROCEDURES. The provisions of Sections 154.021 through 154.023, 154.053, 154.054, and 154.071 through 154.073 shall apply to parties and mediators participating in settlement weeks held under this chapter.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1211, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 5.008, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 155.005. AUTHORITY OF COURT. Each court participating in settlement weeks under this chapter shall have the authority to make orders needed, consistent with existing law, to implement settlement weeks and ensure any party's good faith participation.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1211, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 5.009, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 155.006. FUNDING; COOPERATION WITH OTHER ORGANIZATIONS. The administrative judge may use any available funding from funds regularly used for court administration to carry out the purpose and intent of this chapter. The administrative judge shall cooperate with the director of any established mediation or alternative dispute resolution center, the local bar, and other organizations to encourage participation and to develop public awareness of settlement weeks.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1211, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 5.010, eff. September 1, 2009.